Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-128
Governor; disability; removal; examination; conference; members; findings; effect.

Whenever a Governor who has been unable to discharge the duties of the office believes his disability to be removed, he may call a conference consisting of the three persons referred to as members of such a conference in subsection (1) of section 84-127. The three members of the conference shall examine the disabled Governor. After the examination they shall conduct a secret ballot and, by unanimous vote may find the disability removed, and their findings shall immediately be made public.

Laws 1961, c. 452, § 2, p. 1380.